Missouri, session 2026, HB2323.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 589, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto three new sections, to
be known as sections 589.750, 589.752, and 589.753, to read as follows:
589.750. 1. The provisions of sections 589.750 to 589.753 shall be known as the
"Missouri Domestic Abuse Offender Registration and Accountability Act".
2. For purposes of sections 589.750 to 589.753, the following terms mean:
(1) "Domestic abuse offense", a felony or class A misdemeanor offense under
chapter 565 involving physical injury, threat of physical injury, or sexual assault
committed by one family or household member against another;
(2) "High-risk offender", an offender convicted of a domestic abuse offense who:
(a) Has two or more prior convictions for a domestic abuse offense; or
(b) Has been determined through an evidence-based risk assessment approved
by the department of public safety to present a high risk of recidivism;
(3) "Law enforcement agency", any city, county, or state police department or
law enforcement entity authorized to enforce laws within the state;
(4) "Offender", a person determined by a court to meet the definition of a high-
risk offender under this section;
(5) "Registration", the process by which an offender provides personal
information to the department of public safety for inclusion in a secure and confidential
database accessible only to authorized law enforcement personnel.
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2323 2
3. A sentencing court may order a high-risk offender to register with the
department of public safety as provided under this section.
4. (1) Prior to ordering registration under this section, the sentencing court shall
conduct a hearing to determine whether:
(a) The person meets the definition of a high-risk offender; and
(b) Registration is necessary to protect public safety.
(2) At the hearing, the offender shall have the right to counsel and the right to
present evidence relevant to risk and rehabilitation.
(3) The sentencing court shall make written findings of fact supporting any
order requiring registration under this section.
5. Any person ordered to register with the department of public safety under this
section shall register within seventy-two hours of the date of his or her conviction or of
his or her release from incarceration, whichever occurs later.
6. Offenders shall provide to the department of public safety the following
information when registering:
(1) Full legal name and any aliases;
(2) Date of birth;
(3) Current residential address and any past addresses from the preceding five
years;
(4) Current employment information;
(5) Current vehicle information, including license plate number and vehicle
identification number for each vehicle leased or owned by the offender; and
(6) Any other information deemed necessary by the department of public safety.
7. Offenders shall update their registration information with the department of
public safety within ten days of any change to the information required under
subsection 6 of this section. The department shall provide reasonable procedures and
assistance for offenders who are homeless, without stable housing, or otherwise unable
to comply strictly with such requirement.
8. Offenders shall be required to maintain registration for a duration of five
years following the completion of their sentence, probation, or parole, unless otherwise
ordered by the court.
9. After three years of demonstrated compliance and no new offenses, an
offender may petition the sentencing court for removal from the registry. The
department of public safety shall annually review registrations and may recommend
early termination for compliant offenders who are assessed as low risk.
589.752. 1. The department of public safety shall maintain a secure and
confidential electronic database of registered domestic abuse offenders. Access to the

HB 2323 3
database shall be restricted to law enforcement agencies and courts for purposes of
investigation, supervision, or victim safety planning. No information contained in the
registry shall be publicly disclosed or used to identify or locate any victim of domestic
abuse.
2. The department of public safety shall notify victims prior to the release of any
offender information to law enforcement. The department shall coordinate with
certified victim service organizations to provide safety planning, notification, and
support.
3. An offender who knowingly and willfully fails to register or update
information as required under sections 589.750 to 589.753 shall be subject to:
(1) For a first violation of the requirement to register or update information, a
civil fine not exceeding five hundred dollars, with written notification and fifteen days to
correct such violation before any penalty is imposed; and
(2) For a second or subsequent willful violation of the requirement to register or
update information, a class A misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment not to exceed
one year and a fine not to exceed one thousand dollars.
4. The department of public safety shall establish procedures to assist offenders
in maintaining compliance with registration requirements, including reminders,
counseling, and verification programs.
589.753. 1. The department of public safety shall allocate necessary funding and
resources to implement and maintain the domestic abuse offender registration system
including, but not limited to, funding for personnel, technology, and training.
2. Funding authorized under this section shall not reduce or replace
appropriations for victim services, prevention, or domestic violence intervention
programs.
3. The state auditor shall conduct a performance audit of the registry every three
years to evaluate compliance, costs, and effectiveness.
4. The department of public safety shall submit a biennial report to the general
assembly detailing:
(1) Recidivism rates of registered offenders;
(2) The registry's effectiveness in assisting law enforcement and protecting
victims; and
(3) Recommendations for continuation, modification, or repeal of the registry
program.
5. Under section 23.253 of the Missouri sunset act:

HB 2323 4
(1) The provisions of the new program authorized under sections 589.750 to
589.753 shall sunset six years after the effective date of sections 589.750 to 589.753
unless reauthorized by an act of the general assembly; and
(2) Sections 589.750 to 589.753 shall terminate on September first of the
calendar year immediately following the calendar year in which the program authorized
under sections 589.750 to 589.753 is sunset.
6. The director of the department of public safety may promulgate all necessary
rules and regulations for the administration of this section. Any rule or portion of a
rule, as that term is defined in section 536.010, that is created under the authority
delegated in this section shall become effective only if it complies with and is subject to
all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section 536.028. This section and
chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the general assembly
pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective date, or to disapprove and annul
a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking authority
and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
✔